Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-186.01
Commercial weighing and measuring devices; Certificate of Conformance; required; when.

(1) No person shall sell a commercial weighing and measuring device within the State of Nebraska unless a Certificate of Conformance has been issued for the device except when the device is exempted by subsection (6) of this section.

(2) No person shall use a commercial weighing and measuring device within the State of Nebraska unless a Certificate of Conformance has been issued for the device prior to use except when the device is exempted by subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section.

(3) Commercial weighing and measuring devices in service in Nebraska prior to September 6, 1991, which meet the specifications, tolerances, and other technical requirements of National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44 shall be exempt from meeting the requirements for the Certificate of Conformance.

(4) Commercial weighing and measuring devices removed from service by the owner or on which the department has issued a removal order after September 6, 1991, and returned to service at a later date shall be modified to meet all specifications, tolerances, and other technical requirements of National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44 adopted by the Legislature on the date of the return to service. Such commercial weighing and measuring devices shall not be required to have been issued a Certificate of Conformance.

(5) Commercial weighing and measuring devices in service prior to September 6, 1991, which are modified after such date shall meet all specifications, tolerances, and other technical requirements of National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44 adopted by the Legislature on the date of the modification. Such commercial weighing and measuring devices shall not be required to have been issued a Certificate of Conformance.

(6) Commercial weighing and measuring devices in service prior to September 6, 1991, and sold after such date shall be modified by the seller, unless the buyer and seller agree by contract to exchange the modification responsibility, to meet all specifications, tolerances, and other technical requirements of National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44 adopted by the Legislature on the date sold. Such commercial weighing and measuring devices shall not be required to have been issued a Certificate of Conformance.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 473, § 3.